Utah statutes.
77-3-12.   Record of conviction conclusive evidence -- Judgment on undertaking.

In an action filed by the county attorney to recover on an undertaking:

(1)  The offense shall be alleged as a breach of the undertaking stated in a record of conviction and a record of conviction is conclusive evidence thereof.

(2)  If the court finds the offense constitutes a breach of the undertaking, judgment for the amount of the undertaking shall be entered against the parties liable.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

